Arkansas, session 2025, HB1835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-906 is repealed.
5-4-906. Record sealing upon completion.
(a) A pre-adjudication probation program judge, on his or her own
motion or upon a request from the participant in the pre-adjudication
probation program, shall order sealing and dismissal of a case if:
(1) The participant in the pre-adjudication probation program
has successfully completed a pre-adjudication probation program, as
determined by the pre-adjudication probation program judge;
(2) The pre-adjudication probation program judge has received a
recommendation from the prosecuting attorney for sealing and dismissal of the
case; and
*CEB159*
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(3) The pre-adjudication probation program judge, after
considering the past criminal history of the participant in the pre-
adjudication probation program, determines that sealing and dismissal of the
case is appropriate.
(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the pre-adjudication probation program
court, sealing under this section shall be as described in the Comprehensive
Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 10-3-2901(b)(4), concerning the members of
the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) Three (3) district court judges who preside over a specialty
court program as defined under § 16-10-139(a) to be appointed by the Arkansas
District Judges Judicial Council, Inc.;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-10-139 is amended to read as follows:
16-10-139. Specialty court program evaluation and approval — Transfer —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “specialty court program” means one (1)
of the following:
(1) A pre-adjudication probation program under § 5-4-901 et
seq.;
(2) An approved A drug court program under the Arkansas Drug
Court Act, § 16-98-301 et seq.;
(3) The A Swift and Certain Accountability on Probation Pilot
Program under § 16-93-1701 et seq.; and
(4) Any other specialty court program that has been approved by
the Supreme Court, including without limitation specialty court programs
known as:
(A) A DWI/BWI specialty court program;
(B)(5) A mental health specialty court program;
(C)(6) A veterans treatment specialty court program;
(D)(7) A juvenile drug court;
(E)(8) A “HOPE” court; and
(F)(9) A domestic violence specialty court program family
treatment court program under § 9-27-801 et seq.
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(b) A specialty court program operated by a circuit court or district
court must be approved by the Supreme Court in the court's administrative
plan submitted under Supreme Court Administrative Order Nos. 14 and 18.
(c)(1) The Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee shall evaluate
and make findings with respect to all specialty court programs operated by a
circuit court or district court in this state and refer the findings to the
Supreme Court.
(2) An evaluation under this section shall reflect nationally
recognized and peer-reviewed standards for each particular type of specialty
court program.
(3) The Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee shall also:
(A) Establish, implement, and operate a uniform specialty
court program evaluation process to ensure specialty court program resources
are uniformly directed to high-risk, high-need offenders and that specialty
court programs provide effective and proven practices that reduce recidivism,
as well as other factors such as substance dependency, among participants;
(B) Establish an evaluation process that ensures that any
new and existing specialty court program that is a drug court program meets
standards for drug court program operation under § 16-98-302(b) promulgated
by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee; and
(C) Promulgate rules to be approved by the Supreme Court
to carry out the evaluation process under this section.
(d) A specialty court program shall be evaluated under the following
schedule:
(1) A specialty court program established on or after April 1,
2015, shall be evaluated after its second year of funded operation;
(2) A specialty court program in existence on April 1, 2015,
shall be evaluated under the requirements of this section prior to expending
resources budgeted for fiscal year 2017; and
(3) A specialty court program shall be reevaluated every two (2)
years after the initial evaluation.
(e)(1)(A) On motion of a specialty court program participant, a
specialty court judge who presides over a specialty court program may by
written order transfer responsibility for supervision and specialty court
program enforcement of the specialty court program participant's case to
another specialty court judge with the consent of the other specialty court
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
judge.
(B) The specialty court program participant shall comply
with the policies and procedures for the specialty court program to which the
specialty court program participant's case is transferred.
(C) The specialty court judge to whom the specialty court
program participant's case is transferred may impose sanctions on the
specialty court program participant, including without limitation the
imposition of a period of incarceration and the requirement of inpatient
treatment under the written policies and procedures for the specialty court
program to which the specialty court program participant's case has been
transferred.
(2)(A) If the specialty court judge to whom the specialty court
program participant's case has been transferred determines that the specialty
court program participant has successfully completed the specialty court
program, the specialty court judge shall notify the transferring specialty
court judge and request that the appropriate orders be entered in the
specialty court program participant's case.
(B)(i) If after a specialty court program participant's
case is transferred, the specialty court team recommends that the specialty
court program participant be removed from the specialty court program, the
specialty court judge shall enter an order returning the specialty court
program participant's case to the transferring specialty court program.
(ii) Upon return of the specialty court program
participant's case to the transferring specialty court program, the specialty
court judge shall determine an appropriate disposition of the matter.
(f)(1)(A) If a specialty court program participant's case is
transferred from a district court, all assessed fines, penalties, court
costs, and fees other than those described under subdivision (f)(2) of this
section shall be paid to the transferring district court, notwithstanding the
provisions of § 16-10-141.
(B) The funds described under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of
this section shall be disbursed as required under § 16-17-707.
(2) In accordance with § 16-10-141(b)(2)-(7), the district court
to which the case is transferred may assess and collect:
(A) Treatment costs;
(B) Drug testing costs;
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(C) A local specialty court program user fee;
(D) Necessary supervision fees, including any applicable
residential treatment fees;
(E) Global Positioning System monitoring costs; and
(F) Continuous alcohol monitoring fees.
(g)(1) If a specialty court program participant's case is transferred
from a circuit court, all assessed fines, penalties, court costs, and fees
other than those under subdivision (g)(2) of this section shall be paid to
the transferring circuit court, notwithstanding the provisions of § 16-98-
304.
(2) In accordance with §§ 5-4-907, 16-10-701, 16-98-304, 16-100-
209, and 16-101-104, the circuit court to which the specialty court program
participant's case is transferred may assess and collect:
(A) Treatment costs;
(B) Drug testing costs;
(C) A local specialty court program user fee;
(D) Necessary supervision fees, including any applicable
residential treatment fees;
(E) A fee determined or authorized under § 12-27-
125(b)(17)(B) or § 16-93-104(a)(1) that is to be paid to the Division of
Community Correction;
(F) Global Positioning System monitoring costs;
(G) Continuous alcohol monitoring fees;
(H) Tuition and other educational fees for a vocational
school, technical school, community college, or two-year or four-year public
university that is part of the pre-adjudication probation program in which
the specialty court program participant is participating; and
(I) A specialty court program public defender user fee.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §§ 16-10-143 and 16-10-144 are amended to
read as follows:
16-10-143. Contracts — Qualified attorneys — Definition Specialty court
counsel.
(a) As used in this section, “qualified attorney” means an attorney
who:
(1) Has previously been employed as an attorney by the state
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
regardless of the limitation provided under § 19-11-709(d); or
(2) Is currently serving as a part-time public defender or is
otherwise employed by the state as an attorney on a part-time basis.
(b) The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may employ
or enter into a professional service contract with a qualified an attorney to
serve as a specialty court team member and to represent specialty court
participants.
(c)(b) The fees for contracted services provided by a qualified an
attorney under subsection (a) of this section shall be paid from funds
appropriated for that purpose to the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c)(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts may contract with or
employ an attorney who has previously been employed by the state regardless
of the limitation otherwise provided under § 19-11-709(d).
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts may also contract
with or employ an attorney who currently serves as part-time public defender
or is otherwise employed by the state as an attorney on a part-time basis.
(d)(1) A qualified attorney An attorney who is employed or contracted
by the Administrative Office of the Courts under this section is eligible for
additional compensation.
(2) Additional compensation received for service under this
section as a specialty court team member or to represent specialty court
participants shall not be construed as exceeding the line-item maximum for
the grade of the qualified attorney's other part-time position, if any.
(e) Any funds appropriated for the purpose of this section remaining
on June 30 shall be retained by the Administrative Office of the Courts and
may be distributed after July 1 as supplemental funding to be used for the
expansion or establishment of specialty court programs in circuit courts
support and administration of specialty court programs and for restorative
and rehabilitative services to specialty court participants.

16-10-144. Contracts — Qualified treatment providers.
(a) The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may enter
into a professional service contract with a qualified treatment provider to
serve as a specialty court team member and or to provide behavioral health
treatment to specialty court participants.
(b) The fees for contracted services provided by a qualified treatment
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
provider shall be paid from funds appropriated for that purpose to the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) Any funds appropriated for the purpose of this section remaining
on June 30 shall be retained by the Administrative Office of the Courts and
may be distributed after July 1 as supplemental funding for the expansion or
establishment of specialty court programs in circuit courts support and
administration of specialty court programs and for restorative and
rehabilitative services to specialty court participants.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 16-10-701 is amended to read as follows:
16-10-701. Additional fees for specialty court programs — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Pre-adjudication” means the period of time after:
(A) The prosecuting attorney files a criminal information
or an indictment is filed in circuit court;
(B) The person named in the criminal information or
indictment is arraigned on the charge in circuit court; and
(C) The person enters a specialty court program without a
guilty plea or the person enters a plea of guilty but before the circuit
court enters a judgment and pronounces by entering a plea of guilty but the
circuit court does not enter a judgment and pronounce a sentence against the
person; and
(2) “Specialty court program” means:
(A) A pre-adjudication probation program under § 5-4-901
et seq.;
(B) An approved A drug court program under the Arkansas
Drug Court Act, § 16-98-301 et seq.;
(C) A Swift and Certain Accountability on Probation Pilot
Program under § 16-93-1701 et seq.; and
(D) Any other specialty court program that has been
approved by the Supreme Court, including without limitation specialty court
programs known as:
(i) A DWI court;
(ii) A mental health court;
(iii) A veteran's court;
(iv) A juvenile drug court;
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(v) A “HOPE” court;
(vi) A “smarter sentencing” court; and
(vii) A mental health crisis intervention center. A
DWI/BWI specialty court program under § 16-102-101 et seq.;
(E) A mental health specialty court program under § 16-
100-201 et seq.;
(F) A veterans treatment specialty court program under §
16-101-101 et seq.;
(G) A juvenile drug court under § 16-98-303; and
(H) A family treatment specialty court program under § 9-
27-801.
(b) In addition to any other court cost or court fee provided by law:
(1) A specialty court program user fee of up to two hundred
fifty dollars ($250) shall be assessed on any participant in a specialty
court program and remitted to the Administration of Justice Funds Section by
the court clerk for deposit into the State Treasury as special revenues
credited to the Specialty Court Program Fund; and
(2) A specialty court program public defender user fee not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) may be assessed by the court for a
defendant who participates in a specialty court program designed for pre-
adjudication purposes and who is appointed representation by a public
defender and remitted to the Administration of Justice Funds Section by the
court clerk for deposit into the State Treasury to the credit of the Public
Defender User Fees Fund within the State Central Services Fund.
(c) A district court or circuit court may not assess and collect a fee
under this section if the district court or circuit court is operating a
specialty court program that has not been previously approved by or no longer
meets the approval criteria of the Supreme Court.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1403(b), concerning the scope of the
comprehensive criminal record sealing act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Inconsistencies between this subchapter and any other sections
within the Arkansas Code in existence January 1, 2014, are resolved in favor
of this subchapter, except that this subchapter does not apply to:
(1) The Arkansas Drug Court Act, § 16-98-301 et seq.;
(2) Extended juvenile jurisdiction records under § 9-27-508,
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
unless the records are considered adult criminal records under § 9-27-501 et
seq.; and
(3)(2) The sealing of juvenile records.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 90, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Specialty Court Programs

16-90-1601. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, “specialty court program” means:
(1) A pre-adjudication probation program under § 5-4-901 et
seq.;
(2) A drug court program under the Arkansas Drug Court Act, §
16-98-301 et seq.;
(3) A Swift and Certain Accountability on Probation Pilot
Program under § 16-93-1701 et seq.;
(4) A DWI/BWI specialty court program under § 16-102-101 et
seq.;
(5) A mental health specialty court program under § 16-100-201
et seq.;
(6) A veterans treatment specialty court program under § 16-101-
101 et seq.;
(7) A juvenile drug court under § 16-98-303; and
(8) A family treatment specialty court program under § 9-27-801.

16-90-1602. Dismissal of case and record sealing by specialty court
judge.
(a) Upon a participant’s successful completion of a specialty court
program, a specialty court program judge may order dismissal of a case and
sealing of a record if:
(1) The specialty court program judge has received a
recommendation from the prosecuting attorney for dismissal of the case and
the sealing of the record; and
(2) The specialty court program judge, after considering the
offender's past criminal history, determines that dismissal of the case and
the sealing of the record are appropriate.
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(b) Sealing under this subsection shall follow the procedures in the
Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.,
except that:
(1) A specialty court program judge may enter an order to seal a
participant’s case immediately upon completion of the specialty court
program; and
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 16-90-1406(c)(1), there
shall be no limit to the number of previous felony convictions a petitioner
may have.
(c) A specialty court program judge shall not dismiss an offense of
driving or boating while intoxicated and shall not order sealing until the
applicable lookback periods under § 5-65-111 have elapsed.
(d) A judge presiding over a specialty court program established in
circuit court may seal a conviction entered by a circuit court and a judge
presiding over a specialty court program established in district court may
seal a conviction entered by a district court if the following conditions are
met:
(1) The participant has successfully completed the specialty
court program;
(2) The participant has successfully completed the sentence
entered by the other court; and
(3) The other court agreed that sealing is appropriate and has
signed the uniform sealing order provided by the Arkansas Crime Information
Center.

16-90-1603. Transfer of specialty court program supervision.
(a)(1) A specialty court program judge may authorize a participant to
complete a specialty court program in another county with the consent of the
receiving judge.
(2) A written order reflecting the authorization shall be signed
by both judges.
(3) The participant’s case in the originating county shall
remain open until the originating court enters an appropriate order that:
(A) The court has received notification from the receiving
county that the participant has successfully completed the specialty court
program; or
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(B) The participant did not successfully complete the
specialty court program or was otherwise terminated from the specialty court
program and subsequently sentenced.
(4) To ensure that multiple criminal cases are not opened for
the same charge, no new criminal case shall be created by the receiving
ccounty.
(5) A specialty court program established in a circuit court may
only utilize this section to authorize supervision of a program participant
by another program established in a circuit court, and a DWI/BWI specialty
court program may only authorize supervision of a program participant by
another DWI/BWI specialty court program.
(b)(1) A participant shall comply with the policies and procedures of
the receiving specialty court program.
(2) The receiving court shall be responsible for ensuring the
participant’s adherence to the specialty court program's policies and
procedures, shall have the authority to order treatment, and shall have the
authority to impose sanctions, including a period of incarceration.
(3)(A) If the receiving specialty court program judge determines
that the participant has successfully completed the program, the receiving
specialty court program judge shall notify the originating specialty court
program judge and request that the appropriate orders be entered in the
participant's case.
(B)(i) If the receiving specialty court program judge
decides that the participant should be removed from the specialty court
program, the receiving specialty court program judge shall enter an order
returning the participant’s supervision to the originating specialty court
program.
(ii) Upon return of the participant's supervision to
the originating specialty court program, the specialty court program judge
shall determine an appropriate disposition of the matter.
(c)(1) All assessed fines, fees, and court costs on the underlying
offenses shall be collected by the originating specialty court program.
(2) All specialty court program-related fees and costs shall be
assessed and collected by the receiving specialty court program.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code §§ 16-98-302 — 16-98-306 are amended to read
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
as follows:
16-98-302. Purpose and intent.
(a) There is a critical need for judicial intervention and support for
effective treatment programs that reduce the incidence of drug use, drug
addiction, and family separation due to parental substance abuse and drug-
related crimes. It is the intent of the General Assembly for this subchapter
to enhance public safety by facilitating the creation, expansion, and
coordination of drug court programs.
(b) The goals of the drug court programs in this state shall be
consistent with the standards adopted by the United States Department of
Justice and recommended by the National Association of Drug Court
Professionals and shall include the following key components: national
standards.
(1) Integration of substance abuse treatment with justice system
case processing;
(2) Use of a nonadversarial approach in which prosecution and
defense promote public safety while protecting the right of the accused to
due process;
(3) Early identification, with the use of a validated risk-needs
assessement, of eligible moderate-to-high-risk participants and prompt
placement of eligible participants;
(4) Access to a continuum of treatment, rehabilitation, and
related services;
(5) Frequent testing for alcohol and illicit drugs;
(6) A coordinated strategy among the judge, prosecution,
defense, and treatment providers to govern offender compliance;
(7) Ongoing judicial interaction with each participant;
(8) Monitoring and evaluation of the achievement of program
goals and effectiveness;
(9) Continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective
planning, implementation, and operation; and
(10) Development of partnerships with public agencies and
community-based organizations to generate local support and enhance drug
court effectiveness.
(c)(1) Drug court programs are specialized court dockets within the
existing structure of the Arkansas court system. Drug court programs offer
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
judicial monitoring of intensive treatment and strict supervision of addicts
in drug and drug-related cases.
(2) The creation of a drug court program docket and the
appointment of a circuit judge to that docket shall be approved by the
administrative judge in each judicial circuit and made a part of the judicial
circuit's administrative plan required by Supreme Court Administrative Order
Number 14.
(d) Drug court program success shall be determined by the rate of
recidivism of all drug court participants, including participants who do not
graduate.

16-98-303. Drug court programs authorized.
(a)(1) Each judicial district circuit of this state is authorized to
establish a drug court program programs under this subchapter.
(2) A drug court established under this subchapter shall be
approved under § 16-10-139.
(3)(A) A drug court program may be pre-adjudication or post-
adjudication for an adult offender or a juvenile offender.
(B) A juvenile drug court program or services may be used
in a delinquency case or a family in need of services case.
(C) A juvenile drug court program or services may be used
in a dependency-neglect case under § 9-27-334.
(4)(3) Notwithstanding the authorization described in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a judge of a circuit court, drug court,
or juvenile division of circuit court may not order any services or treatment
under subsection (b) of this section or § 16-98-305 unless:
(A) An administrative and programmatic appropriation has
been made for those purposes;
(B) Administrative and programmatic funding is available
for those purposes; and
(C) Administrative and programmatic positions have been
authorized for those purposes.
(5)(4) As determined by the Division of Community Correction, an
adult drug court program established under this section shall target high-
risk offenders and medium-risk offenders.
(b)(1) A drug court program shall incorporate services from the
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
Division of Community Correction, the Department of Human Services, and the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(2) Subject to an appropriation, funding, and position
authorization, both programmatic and administrative, and subject to the
requirements of eligibility as defined in § 16-93-1202, the Division of
Community Correction:
(A) Shall:
(i) Establish standards regarding the classification
of a drug court program participant as a high-risk offender or medium-risk
offender;
(ii) Provide positions for persons to serve as
probation officers, drug counselors, and administrative assistants;
(iii) Provide for drug testing for drug court program
participants;
(iv) Provide for intensive outpatient treatment for
drug court program participants;
(v) Provide for intensive short-term and long-term
residential treatment for drug court program participants; and
(vi) Develop clinical assessment capacity, including
drug testing, to identify a drug court program participant with a substance
addiction and develop a treatment protocol that improves the drug court
program participant's likelihood of success; and
(B) May:
(i) Provide for continuous alcohol monitoring for
drug court program participants, including a minimum period of one hundred
twenty (120) days; and
(ii) Develop clinical assessment capacity, including
continuous alcohol monitoring, to identify a drug court program participant
with a substance addiction and develop a treatment protocol that improves the
drug court program participant's likelihood of success.
(3) Subject to an appropriation, funding, and position
authorization, both programmatic and administrative, the department shall:
(A) Provide positions for persons to serve as drug
counselors and administrative assistants in delinquency cases, dependency-
neglect cases, and family in need of services cases;
(B) Provide for drug testing for drug court program
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
participants in delinquency cases, dependency-neglect cases, and family in
need of services cases;
(C) Provide for intensive outpatient treatment for drug
court program participants in delinquency cases, dependency-neglect cases,
and family in need of services cases;
(D) Provide for intensive short-term and long-term
residential treatment for drug court program participants in delinquency
cases, dependency-neglect cases, and family in need of services cases;
(E) Certify and license treatment providers and treatment
facilities that serve drug court program participants;
(F) Provide and oversee residential beds for drug court
programs;
(G) Oversee catchment area facilities for drug court
programs;
(H) Act as a liaison between the courts and drug court
program participants; and
(I) Oversee performance standards for residential and
long-term facilities providing services to drug court programs.
(4) Subject to an appropriation, funding, and position
authorization, both programmatic and administrative, the Administrative
Office of the Courts shall:
(A) Provide state-level coordination and support for drug
court judges and their programs;
(B) Administer funds for the maintenance and operation of
local approved drug court programs;
(C) Provide training and education to drug court judges
and other professionals involved in drug court programs;
(D) Operate as a liaison between drug court judges and
other state-level agencies providing services to drug court programs; and
(E) Develop criteria for determining new drug court
locations that take into account:
(i) The current size of the defendant population
that meets the criteria for drug court participation;
(ii) Recent trends indicating an increasing defendant
population that meets the criteria for drug court participation;
(iii) Existing drug treatment programs currently in
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
place and operating through the courts, the county jail, or the Division of
Correction; and
(iv) The drug court program's use of evidence-based
practices by key partners involved in the prospective drug court program
including those to assess the needs of drug court participants in order to
effectively target programming toward high-risk participants.
(c)(1) A drug court program shall not be available to any defendant
who:
(A) Has a pending charge for a violent felony against him
or her;
(B) Has been convicted of a violent felony offense as
defined in this subchapter or adjudicated delinquent as a juvenile of a
violent felony offense; or
(C)(i) Is required to register under the Sex Offender
Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.
(ii) The exclusion under subdivision (c)(1)(C)(i) of
this section shall not apply to the offense of prostitution, § 5-70-102.
(2) Eligible offenses may be further restricted by the rules of
a specific drug court program.
(3) Nothing in this subchapter shall require a drug court
program judge to consider or accept every offender with a treatable condition
or addiction, regardless of the fact that the controlling offense is eligible
for consideration in the drug court program.
(4) Any defendant who is denied entry to a drug court program
shall be prosecuted as provided by law.
(d)(1) Drug court programs may require a separate judicial processing
system differing in practice and design from the traditional adversarial
criminal prosecution and trial systems.
(2) A drug court team shall be designated by a circuit judge
assigned to manage the drug court program docket and may include a circuit
judge, a prosecuting attorney, a public defender or private defense attorney,
one (1) or more addiction counselors, one (1) or more probation officers, one
(1) or more private treatment provider representatives, and any other
individual or individuals determined necessary by the drug court program
judge.
(3)(A) The administrative judge of the judicial district shall
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
designate one (1) or more circuit judges to administer the drug court
program.
(B) If a county is in a judicial district circuit that
does not have a circuit judge who is able to administer the drug court
program on a consistent basis, the administrative plan for the judicial
circuit required by Supreme Court Administrative Order No. 14 may designate a
district court judge to administer the drug court program.
(e) Each judicial district may circuit shall develop a training and
implementation policies and procedures manual for drug court programs with
the assistance of the:
(1) Department;
(2) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(3) Adult Education Section;
(4) Division of Community Correction; and
(5) Administrative Office of the Courts.
(f) A Division of Drug Court Specialty Court Programs is created
within the Administrative Office of the Courts. The position of Drug Court
Specialty Court Coordinator is created within the Division of Drug Court
Specialty Court Programs, and the Drug Court Specialty Court Coordinator
shall:
(1) Provide assistance, counsel, and advice to the Specialty
Court Program Advisory Committee;
(2) Serve as a coordinator between drug court judges, the
Division of Community Correction, the Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, private
treatment provider representatives, and public health advocates;
(3) Establish, manage, and maintain a uniform statewide drug
court information system to track information and data on drug court program
participants to be reviewed by the Specialty Court Program Advisory
Committee;
(4) Train and educate drug court program judges and drug court
program staff in those judicial districts circuits maintaining a drug court
program; and
(5) Provide staff assistance to the Arkansas Drug Court
Professionals Association;
(6) Oversee the disbursement of funds appropriated to the
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
Administrative Office of the Courts for the maintenance and operation of
local approved drug court programs based on a formula developed by the
Administrative Office of the Courts and reviewed by the Specialty Court
Program Advisory Committee; and
(7) Develop guidelines to be reviewed by the Specialty Court
Program Advisory Committee to serve as a framework for developing effective
local drug court programs and to provide a structure for conducting research
and evaluation for drug court program accountability.
(g)(1) A drug court program judge, on his or her own motion or upon a
request from an offender, may order dismissal of a case and the sealing of
the record if:
(A) The offender has successfully completed a drug court
program, as determined by the drug court program judge;
(B) The offender has received aftercare programming;
(C) The drug court program judge has received a
recommendation from the prosecuting attorney for dismissal of the case and
the sealing of the record; and
(D) The drug court program judge, after considering the
offender's past criminal history, determines that dismissal of the case and
the sealing of the record are appropriate.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(B) of this
section, if the offender has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been
found guilty of an offense falling within a target group under § 16-93-
1202(10)(A)(i) in another Arkansas court, the drug court program judge may
order sealing and dismissal of the offense falling within a target group with
the written concurrence of the other Arkansas court.
(B) The following offenses are not eligible for sealing
under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of this section:
(i) Residential burglary, § 5-39-201(a);
(ii) Commercial burglary, § 5-39-201(b);
(iii) Breaking or entering, § 5-39-202; and
(iv) The fourth and subsequent offense of driving
while intoxicated, § 5-65-103.
(3) Unless otherwise ordered by the drug court program judge,
sealing under this subsection shall be as described in the Comprehensive
Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835

16-98-304. Cost and fees.
(a) The adult or juvenile drug court program judge may order the
offender to pay:
(1) Court costs as provided in § 16-10-305;
(2) Treatment costs;
(3) Drug testing costs;
(4) A local drug court program user fee;
(5) Necessary supervision fees, including any applicable
residential treatment fees;
(6) Any fees determined or authorized under § 12-27-
125(b)(17)(B) or § 16-93-104(a)(1) that are to be paid to the Department
Division of Community Correction;
(7) Global Positioning System monitoring; and
(8) Continuous alcohol monitoring fees.
(b)(1) The drug court program judge shall establish a schedule for the
payment of costs and fees.
(2) The cost for treatment, drug testing, continuous alcohol
monitoring if ordered, and supervision shall be set by the treatment and
supervision providers respectively and made part of the order of the drug
court program judge for payment.
(3) Program Drug court program user fees shall be set by the
drug court program judge.
(4) Treatment, drug testing, continuous alcohol monitoring if
ordered, and supervision costs or fees shall be paid to the respective
providers.
(5) Fees determined or authorized under § 12-27-125(b)(17)(B) or
§ 16-93-104(a)(1) shall be paid to the Department Division of Community
Correction.
(6)(A) All court costs and program user fees assessed by the
drug court judge shall be paid to the court clerk designated collector for
remittance to the county treasury under § 14-14-1313.
(B) All installment payments shall initially be deemed to
be collection of court costs under § 16-10-305 until the court costs have
been collected in full with any remaining payments representing collections
of other fees and costs as authorized in this section and shall be credited
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
to the county administration of justice fund and distributed under § 16-10-
307.
(C) Local program user fees shall be credited to a fund
known as the “drug court program fund” and appropriated by the quorum court
for the benefit and administration of the drug court program.
(7) Court orders for costs and fees shall remain an obligation
of the offender with court monitoring until fully paid.
(c) A circuit court may not assess and collect a fee if the circuit
court is operating a specialty court program that has not previously been
approved or no longer meets the approval criteria of the Supreme Court.

16-98-305. Required resources.
Each approved drug court program established under this subchapter,
subject to an appropriation, funding, and position authorization, both
programmatic and administrative, shall be provided with the following
resources:
(1) The Department Division of Community Correction shall
provide the following pursuant to § 16-98-303(b)(2) for adult offenders:
(A)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(A)(ii) of
this section, provide a A minimum of one (1) drug counselor position for
every thirty (30) drug court program participants.;
(ii) If a drug court judge does not require the drug
counselor position or positions described in subdivision (1)(A)(i) of this
section, funding for a drug counselor or counselors shall be provided under
subdivision (1)(E)(i) of this section;
(B) Provide a A minimum of one (1) probation officer
position for every forty (40) drug court participants;
(C) Provide a A minimum of one (1) administrative
assistant position for each drug court program; and
(D) Provide for drug Drug screens and testing as needed;
and
(E)(i) Based upon a formula to be developed by the
Administrative Office of the Courts, reviewed by the Specialty Court Program
Advisory Committee, and approved by the Legislative Council, provide for:
(a) Intensive outpatient treatment to be made
available to the drug court program in each judicial district;
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(b) Short-term and long-term inpatient
treatment to be made available to the drug court program in each judicial
district; and
(c) A drug court judge to contract with a
local licensed treatment provider for counseling services for drug court
participants so that each privately contracted addiction counselor does not
have more than thirty (30) drug court participants in his or her caseload.
(ii) The Department of Community Correction shall
enter into an interagency memorandum of understanding with the Administrative
Office of the Courts in order to establish the process and procedures for the
payment of treatment services ordered by a drug court judge and funded
through the Department of Community Correction.
(iii) Expenditures of funds for treatment services
allocated to each approved drug court program under the formula described in
subdivision (1)(E)(i) of this section shall be at the direction of a drug
court judge, except as limited by the procedures adopted in the memorandum of
understanding described in subdivision (1)(E)(ii) of this section;
(2) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Provide a minimum of one (1) drug counselor position
for every thirty (30) drug court program participants in delinquency cases,
dependency-neglect cases, and family in need of services cases;
(B) Provide for drug screens and testing as needed in
delinquency cases, dependency-neglect cases, and family in need of services
cases; and
(C) Provide for intensive outpatient treatment and short-
term and long-term inpatient treatment to be made available to the drug court
program in each judicial district in delinquency cases, dependency-neglect
cases, and family in need of services cases based upon a formula developed by
the Administrative Office of the Courts and reviewed by the Specialty Court
Program Advisory Committee; and
(3) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall:
(A) Provide funding to be reviewed by the Specialty Court
Program Advisory Committee for additional ongoing maintenance and operation
costs of a local approved drug court program not provided by the Department
of Community Correction or the Department of Human Services, including local
drug court program supplies, education, travel, and related expenses;
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
(B) Provide direct support to the drug court program judge
and drug court program;
(C)(B) Provide coordination between the multidisciplinary
team and the drug court judge;
(D)(C) Provide case management;
(E) Monitor compliance of drug court participants with
drug court program requirements; and
(F)(D) Provide assistance and support to the Specialty
Court Program Advisory Committee for the evaluation of adult and juvenile
specialty court programs.

16-98-306. Collection of data.
(a)(1) An approved drug court program shall collect and provide
monthly data on drug court program applicants and all participants as
required by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee in accordance with
the rules promulgated under § 10-3-2901.
(2) The data shall may include:
(A) The total number of applicants;
(B) The total number of participants;
(C) The total number of successful applicants;
(D) The total number of successful participants;
(E) The total number of unsuccessful participants and the
reason why each unsuccessful participant did not complete the drug court
program;
(F) Information about what happened to each unsuccessful
participant;
(G) The total number of participants who were arrested for
a new criminal offense while in the drug court program;
(H)(G) The total number of participants who were convicted
of a new criminal offense while in the drug court program;
(I)(H) The total number of participants who committed a
violation of one (1) or more conditions of the drug court program and the
resulting sanction;
(J)(I) The results of the initial risk-needs assessment or
other appropriate clinical assessment conducted on each participant;
(K)(J) The total amount of time each drug court program
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
participant was in the drug court program; and
(L)(K) Any other data or information as required by the
Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee in accordance with the rules
promulgated under § 10-3-2901.
(b) The data collected for evaluation purposes under subsection (a) of
this section shall:
(1) Include a minimum standard data set developed and specified
by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee; and
(2) Be maintained in the court files or be otherwise accessible
by the courts and the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee Each court
operating a specialty court program shall utilize the case management system
provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts to maintain data on
applicants and program participants.
(c)(1) As directed by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee,
after an individual is discharged either upon completion or termination of a
drug court program, the drug court program shall conduct, as much as
practical, follow-up contacts with and reviews of former drug court program
participants for key outcome indicators of drug use, recidivism, and
employment.
(2)(A) The follow-up contacts with and reviews of former drug
court program participants shall be conducted as frequently and for a period
of time as determined by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee based
upon the nature of the drug court program and the nature of the participants.
(B) The follow-up contacts with and reviews of former drug
court participants are not extensions of the drug court's jurisdiction over
the drug court participants.
(d) For purposes of standardized measurement of success of drug court
programs across the state, the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee
shall may adopt an operational definition of terms such as “recidivism”,
“retention”, “relapses”, “restarts”, “sanctions imposed”, and “incentives
given” to be used in any evaluation and report of drug court programs.
(e) Each drug specialty court program shall provide to the Specialty
Court Program Advisory Committee and the Administrative Office of the Courts
Specialty Court Division all information requested by the Specialty Court
Program Advisory Committee.
(f) The Division of Drug Court Programs Administrative Office of the
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
Courts, the Division of Community Correction, the Division of Aging, Adult,
and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, and the
Arkansas Crime Information Center shall work together to share and make
available data to provide a comprehensive data management system for the
state's drug court programs.
(g) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall collect monthly data
reports submitted by approved drug courts court programs and provide the
monthly data reports to the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee.
(h) The Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee shall:
(1) Submit a report by July 1 of each year summarizing the data
collected and outcomes achieved by all approved specialty courts; and
(2) Contract with a third-party evaluator every five (5) years
to conduct an evaluation on the effectiveness of the specialty court program
in complying with the key components of § 16-98-302(b).

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 16-100-101(2), concerning definitions
related to mental health and the judicial system, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) “Mental illness” means a condition of a person who has or
has had in the past a diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder
of sufficient duration to meet diagnostic criteria specified by the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders as it existed on
January 1, 2017, that has resulted in functional impairment that
substantially interferes with or limits one (1) or more major life
activities; and

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 16-100-202(b), concerning the goals of a
mental health specialty court program, is repealed.
(b) Mental health specialty court program success is determined by the
rate of recidivism of all mental health specialty court program participants,
including mental health specialty court program participants who do not
graduate from the mental health specialty court program.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 16-100-204 is amended to read as follows:
16-100-204. Administration of mental health specialty court program.
(a) A mental health specialty court program may require a separate
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
judicial processing system differing in practice and design from the
traditional adversarial criminal prosecution and trial systems.
(b)(1) The administrative judge of the judicial district circuit shall
designate one (1) or more circuit judges to be mental health specialty court
judges and to administer the mental health specialty court program.
(2) If a county is in a judicial district circuit that does not
have a circuit judge who is able to administer the mental health specialty
court program on a consistent basis, the administrative plan for the judicial
circuit required by Supreme Court Administrative Order No. Number 14 may
designate a district court judge to be a mental health specialty court judge
and to administer the mental health specialty court program.
(c) A mental health specialty court team shall be designated by a
mental health specialty court judge and may include:
(1) A circuit judge;
(2) A prosecuting attorney;
(3) A public defender or private defense attorney;
(4) One (1) or more healthcare providers with experience in the
field of mental health treatment;
(5) One (1) or more probation officers;
(6) One (1) or more private mental health treatment provider
representatives with experience in the field of mental health treatment; and
(7) Any other individual determined necessary by the mental
health specialty court judge.
(d) Each judicial district may circuit shall develop a training and
implementation manual for the mental health specialty court program with the
assistance of the:
(1) Department of Human Services;
(2) Department of Health;
(3) Division of Community Correction;
(4) Administrative Office of the Courts; and
(5) Other federal, state, and local agencies, organizations, or
entities with an established history of expertise in mental health
conditions.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 16-100-208 is amended to read as follows:
16-100-208. Completion of program — Dismissal of case — Sealing of
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
record.
(a) Upon the mental health specialty court's own motion or upon a
request from a mental health specialty court program participant or his or
her attorney, a mental health specialty court may order dismissal of the case
against the mental health specialty court program participant and the sealing
of the record if:
(1) The mental health specialty court program participant has
successfully completed the mental health specialty court program, as
determined by the mental health specialty court;
(2) The mental health specialty court program participant has
received aftercare programming or a course of continuing mental health
treatment if recommended by the mental health specialty court program
participant's healthcare provider;
(3) The mental health specialty court has received a
recommendation from the prosecuting attorney for dismissal of the case and
the sealing of the record; and
(4) The mental health specialty court, after considering the
mental health specialty court program participant's criminal history,
determines that dismissal of the case and the sealing of the record are
appropriate.
(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the mental health specialty court,
sealing of the record under this section shall be as described in the
Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.
(c) If a mental health specialty court program participant has
successfully completed the program and has his or her case dismissed under
this section § 16-9-1602, he or she may petition the mental health specialty
court for relief from disability to restore the mental health specialty court
program participant's right to purchase a firearm and to otherwise be removed
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation's National Instant Criminal
Background Check System database.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 16-101-101 is amended to read as follows:
16-101-101. Specialty court authorized — Program authorized —
Evaluation — Restriction on services and treatment.
(a) A circuit court may establish a veterans treatment specialty court
program, subject to approval by the Supreme Court in the administrative plan
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
submitted under Supreme Court Administrative Order No. Number 14.
(b) A veterans treatment specialty court is a specialized court within
the existing structure of the court system.
(c) The goals of the veterans treatment specialty court program shall
be consistent with standards adopted by the United States Department of
Justice and the National Association of Drug Court Professionals, as they
existed on January 1, 2021 national standards.
(d) A veterans treatment specialty court program is subject to
evaluation by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee under § 16-10-
139.
(e)(1) A veterans treatment specialty court may not order any
services, including mental health or substance use disorder treatment under
this chapter unless:
(A) An administrative and programmatic appropriation has
been made for the services;
(B) Administrative and programmatic funding is available
for the services; and
(C) Administrative and programmatic positions have been
authorized for the services.
(2) If the requirements of subdivision (e)(1) of this section
are not met, a veterans treatment specialty court may still order services if
the provider waives payment or if the specialty court participant has private
insurance that will pay for the services.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 16-101-106 is repealed.
16-101-106. Completion of program — Dismissal of case — Sealing of
record.
(a) A veterans treatment specialty court judge, on his or her own
motion or upon request from a veterans treatment specialty court program
participant, may order dismissal of a veterans treatment specialty court
program participant's case if:
(1) The veterans treatment specialty court program participant
has successfully completed the veterans treatment specialty court program, as
determined by the veterans treatment specialty court judge;
(2) The veterans treatment specialty court judge has received a
recommendation from the prosecuting attorney for dismissal of the veterans
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
treatment specialty court program participant's case and the sealing of the
record; and
(3) The veterans treatment specialty court judge, after
considering the veterans treatment specialty court program participant's past
criminal history, determines that the dismissal of the veterans treatment
specialty court program participant's case and the sealing of the record are
appropriate.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, if
the veterans treatment specialty court program participant has pleaded guilty
or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of an offense falling within a
target group under § 16-93-1202(10)(A)(i) in another circuit court in this
state, the veterans treatment specialty court judge may order dismissal of
the veterans treatment specialty court program participant's case and the
sealing of the record for an offense falling within the target group with the
written concurrence of the other circuit court.
(2) The following offenses are not eligible for sealing under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section:
(A) Residential burglary, § 5-39-201(a);
(B) Commercial burglary, § 5-39-201(b);
(C) Breaking or entering, § 5-39-202; and
(D) Driving or boating while intoxicated, § 5-65-103.
(c) Unless otherwise ordered by the veterans treatment specialty court
judge, sealing under this subsection shall be as described in the
Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 16-102-102(d)(1), concerning the
jurisdiction of a DWI/BWI specialty court program, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1) The DWI/BWI specialty court shall have jurisdiction of a DWI/BWI
specialty court program participant for sixteen (16) months from the date of
sentencing to complete the DWI/BWI specialty court program in conformance
with the standards adopted by the United States Department of Justice and
recommended by the National Center for DWI Courts, as they existed on January
1, 2021.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 16-102-102(g), concerning probation
03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159

HB1835
services in a DWI/BWI specialty court program, is amended to read as follows:
(g) Subject to Under § 5-65-108, probation and any other services
ordered by the DWI/BWI specialty court shall be ordered may utilize
probationary supervision to monitor a person's compliance with program
requirements and other court orders after the person pleads guilty or nolo
contendere to driving or boating while intoxicated, § 5-65-103.






























03/18/2025 1:13:03 PM CEB159